Maine, session 132, LD305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1483, sub-§12, as amended by PL 2025, c. 152, §2, is further
amended to read:
12. Certain Automobiles owned by certain veterans. Automobiles owned by
veterans who are granted free registration of those vehicles by the Secretary of State under
Title 29‑A, section 523, subsection 1 or 2 or who are disabled by injury or disease incurred
or aggravated during active military service in the line of duty and are receiving any form
of pension or compensation from the United States Government for total, service-
connected disability. A maximum of 3 automobiles owned by a veteran are exempt from
the excise tax. In order for an automobile to qualify for an exemption from the excise tax
Page 1 - 132LR2057(03)

under this subsection, the name of the qualifying veteran must appear on the automobile's
certificate of title. If there are multiple owners of an automobile, at least one of the owners
whose name appears on the certificate of title must meet the requirements of this subsection
in order for the automobile to qualify for the exemption;
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1483, sub-§12-A is enacted to read:
12-A. Automobiles leased by certain veterans. Automobiles leased by veterans who
are disabled by injury or disease incurred or aggravated during active military service in
the line of duty and are receiving any form of pension or compensation from the United
States Government for total, service-connected disability. A maximum of 3 automobiles
leased by a veteran are exempt from the excise tax. In order for an automobile to qualify
for an exemption from the excise tax under this subsection, the name of the qualifying
veteran must appear on the automobile's lease agreement. If there are multiple lessees of
an automobile, at least one of the lessees whose name appears on the automobile's lease
agreement must meet the requirements of this subsection in order for the automobile to
qualify for the exemption.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 - 132LR2057(03)